District of Columbia statutes.
16-4020

Authority of tribunal in case of noncompliance.

(a)

If an agreement fails to meet the requirements of § 16-4004, or a lawyer fails to comply with § 16-4014 or § 16-4015, the tribunal may nonetheless find that the parties intended to enter into a collaborative law participation agreement if they:

(1)

Signed a record indicating an intention to enter into a collaborative law participation agreement; and

(2)

Reasonably believed they were participating in a collaborative law process.

(b)

If the tribunal makes the findings specified in subsection (a) of this section, and the interests of justice require, the tribunal may:

(1)

Enforce an agreement evidenced by a record resulting from the process in which the parties participated;

(2)

Apply the disqualification provisions of §§ 16-4009, 16-4010, and 16-4011; and

(3)

Apply a privilege under § 16-4017.

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 20 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.